dist/programData/liblouis/tables/gr-gr-g1.utb
letter \x1F08 46-1
letter \x1F09 46-1236-1
letter \x1F0A 356-46-1
letter \x1F0B 26-46-1 
letter \x1F0C 356-46-1
letter \x1F0D 26-46-1
letter \x1F0E 256-46-1
letter \x1F0F 235-46-1
letter \x1FBC 46-1-35
letter \x1F88 46-1-35
letter \x1F89 1236-46-1-35
letter \x1F8A 356-46-1-35
letter \x1F8B 26-46-1-35
letter \x1F8C 356-46-1-35
letter \x1F8D 26-46-1-35
letter \x1F8E 256-46-1-35
letter \x1F8F 235-46-1-35
letter \x1F70 5-1					# marked in bold black?
letter \x1F71 5-1					# marked in bold black?
letter \x1F00 1
letter \x1F01 1236-1
letter \x1F02 356-1
letter \x1F03 26-1
letter \x1F04 356-1
letter \x1F05 26-1
letter \x1FB6 6-1
letter \x1F06 256-1
letter \x1F07 4-235-1
letter \x1FB3 1-35
letter \x1FB2 1-35
letter \x1FB4 1-35
letter \x1F80 1-35
letter \x1F81 1236-1-35
letter \x1F82 356-1-35
letter \x1F83 26-1-35
letter \x1F84 356-1-35
letter \x1F85 26-1-35
letter \x1FB7 6-1-35
letter \x1F86 256-1-35
letter \x1F87 235-1-35
letter \x1F18 46-15
letter \x1F19 1236-46-15
letter \x1F1A 356-46-15
letter \x1F1B 26-46-15
letter \x1F1C 356-46-15
letter \x1F1D 26-46-15
letter \x1F72 5-15							# marked in blue?
letter \x1F73 5-15
letter \x1F10 15
letter \x1F11 1236-15
letter \x1F12 356-15
letter \x1F13 26-15
letter \x1F14 356-15
letter \x1F15 26-15
letter \x1F74 5-345
letter \x1F75 5-345
letter \x1F20 345
letter \x1F21 1236-345
letter \x1F22 356-345
letter \x1F23 26-345
letter \x1F24 356-345
letter \x1F25 26-345
letter \x1FC6 6-345
letter \x1F26 256-345
letter \x1F27 235-345
letter \x1FC3 3456
letter \x1FC2 5-3456
letter \x1FC4 5-3456
letter \x1F90 3456
letter \x1F91 1236-3456
letter \x1F92 356-3456
letter \x1F93 26-3456
letter \x1F94 356-3456
letter \x1F95 26-3456
letter \x1FC7 6-3456
letter \x1F96 256-3456
letter \x1F97 235-3456
letter \x1F28 46-345
letter \x1F29 1236-46-345
letter \x1F2A 356-46-345
letter \x1F2B 26-46-345
letter \x1F2C 356-46-345
letter \x1F2D 26-46-345
letter \x1F2E 256-46-345
letter \x1F2F 235-46-345
letter \x1F98 46-3456
letter \x1F99 1236-46-3456
letter \x1F9C 356-46-3456
letter \x1F9D 26-46-3456
letter \x1F9E 256-46-3456
letter \x1F9f 235-46-3456
letter \x1F76 5-24
letter \x1F77 5-24
letter \x1F30 24
letter \x1F31 1236-24
letter \x1F32 356-24
letter \x1F33 26-24
letter \x1F34 356-24
letter \x1F35 26-24
letter \x1fD6 6-24
letter \x1F36 256-24
letter \x1F37 235-24
letter \x1F38 46-24
letter \x1F39 1236-46-24
letter \x1F3A 356-46-24
letter \x1F3B 26-46-24
letter \x1F3C 356-46-24
letter \x1F3D 26-46-24
letter \x1F3E 256-46-24
letter \x1F3F 235-46-24
letter \x1F78 5-135
letter \x1F79 5-135
letter \x1F40 135
letter \x1F41 1236-135
letter \x1F42 356-135
letter \x1F43 26-135
letter \x1F44 356-135
letter \x1F45 26-135
letter \x1F48 46-135
letter \x1F49 1236-46-135
letter \x1F4A 356-46-135
letter \x1f4B 26-46-135
letter \x1F4C 356-46-135
letter \x1f4D 26-46-135
letter \x1F7A 5-13456
letter \x1F7B 5-13456
letter \x1F50 13456
letter \x1F51 1236-13456
letter \x1F52 356-13456
letter \x1F53 26-13456
letter \x1F54 356-13456
letter \x1F55 26-13456
letter \x1FE6 6-13456
letter \x1F56 256-13456
letter \x1F57 235-13456
letter \x1F58 46-13456
letter \x1F59 1236-46-13456
letter \x1F5B 26-46-13456
letter \x1F5D 26-46-13456
letter \x1F5F 235-46-13456
letter \x1F7C 5-245
letter \x1F7D 5-245
letter \x1F60 245
letter \x1F61 1236-245
letter \x1F62 356-245
letter \x1F63 26-245
letter \x1F64 346-245
letter \x1F65 26-245
letter \x1FF6 6-245
letter \x1F66 256-245
letter \x1F67 235-245
letter \x1FF3 2456
letter \x1FF2 5-2456
letter \x1FF4 5-2456
letter \x1FA0 2456
letter \x1FA1 1236-2456
letter \x1FA2 356-2456
letter \x1FA3 26-2456
letter \x1FA4 356-2456
letter \x1FA5 26-2456
letter \x1FF7 6-2456
letter \x1FA6 256-2456
letter \x1FA7 235-2456
letter \x1F68 46-245
letter \x1F69 1236-46-245
letter \x1F6A 456-46-245
letter \x1F6B 26-46-245
letter \x1F6C 356-46-245
letter \x1F6D 26-46-245
letter \x1F6E 256-46-245
letter \x1F6F 235-46-245
letter \x1FA8 46-2456
letter \x1FA9 1236-46-2456
letter \x1FAA 356-46-2456
letter \x1FAB 26-46-2456
letter \x1FAC 356-46-2456
letter \x1FAD 26-46-2456
letter \x1FAE 256-46-2456
letter \x1FAF 235-46-2456

# - this is defined only to make the table compile
letter \x1FD7 16-24-1256
letter \x1FD2 1-5-24
letter \x1FD3 15-24
# - end

always \x03B1\x1F76 5-126
always \x03B1\x1F77 5-126
always \x03B1\x03B9 126
always \x1F00\x1FD6 1-6-24
always \x1F00\x1FD7 16-24-1256
always \x1F00\x1FD2 1-5-24
always \x1F00\x1FD3 15-24
always \x03B1\x1F32 356-126
always \x03B1\x1F33 26-126
always \x03B1\x1F34 356-126
always \x03B1\x1F35 26-126
always \x03B1\x1F36 256-126
always \x03B1\x1F37 235-126
always \x0391\x1F32 356-46-126
always \x0391\x1F33 26-46-126
always \x0391\x1F34 356-46-126
always \x0391\x1F35 26-46-126
always \x0391\x1F36 256-46-126
always \x0391\x1F37 235-46-126
always \x03BF\x1FD2 135-5-24
always \x03BF\x1FD3 135-5-24
always \x03BF\x1F76 5-246
always \x03BF\x1F77 5-246
always \x03BF\x1F32 356-246
always \x03BF\x1F34 356-246
always \x03BF\x1F33 26-246
always \x03BF\x1F35 26-246
always \x039F\x1F32 356-46-246
always \x039F\x1F34 356-46-246
always \x039F\x1F33 26-46-246
always \x039F\x1F35 26-46-246
always \x03B5\x1FD2 15-5-24
always \x03B5\x1FD3 15-5-24
always \x03B5\x1FD6 6-146
always \x03B5\x1F76 5-146
always \x03B5\x1F77 5-146
always \x03B5\x1F32 356-146
always \x03B5\x1F34 356-146
always \x03B5\x1F33 26-146
always \x03B5\x1F35 26-146
always \x03B5\x1F36 256-146
always \x03B5\x1F37 235-146
always \x0395\x1F32 356-46-146
always \x0395\x1F34 356-46-146
always \x0395\x1F33 26-46-146
always \x0395\x1F35 26-46-146
always \x0395\x1F36 256-46-146
always \x0395\x1F37 235-46-146

# ------------------ End Ancient Greek -----------------





#------ Double vowels -------
# lowword \x0391\x0399 126				like lower case pair \x03B1\x03B9
# replace \x0391\x0399 \x03B1\x03B9

always \x03B1\x0390 1-24
always \x03B1\x03AF 126
always \x03B1\x03B0	1-13456
always \x03B1\x03B9 126					like upper case pair \x0391\x0399
always \x03B1\x03C5 16
always \x03B1\x03CA	1-24
always \x03B1\x03CB 1-13456
always \x03B1\x03CD 16

always \x03BF\x0390 135-24
always \x03BF\x03AF 246
always \x03BF\x03B0 135-13456
always \x03BF\x03B9 246
always \x03BF\x03C5 136
always \x03BF\x03CA 135-24
always \x03BF\x03CB 135-13456
always \x03BF\x03CD 136

always \x03AC\x03B9 1-24
always \x03AC\x03C5 1-13456

always \x03AD\x03B9	15-24
always \x03AD\x03C5 15-13456

always \x03CC\x03B9 135-24
always \x03CC\x03C5 135-13456

always \x03B5\x0390 15-24
always \x03B5\x03AF 146
always \x03B5\x03B0 15-13456
always \x03B5\x03B9 146
always \x03B5\x03C5 156
always \x03B5\x03CA 15-24
always \x03B5\x03CB 15-13456
always \x03B5\x03CD 156
# ----------------

always # 5-3456						number sign								x0023
always % 25-1234					percent sign							x0025
always ' 3								apostrophe								x0027
always = 56-2356					equal sign								x003D
always \\ 5-16						reverse solidus						x005C
always ~ 5-26							tilde											x007E
always © 5-14							copyright									x00A9
